Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2407
Interpreters; qualifications.

Any person who serves as an interpreter for persons unable to communicate the English language in court proceedings or probation services as provided in subsection (6) of section 29-2259 shall meet the standards adopted by the Supreme Court. Such standards shall require that interpreters demonstrate the ability to interpret effectively, accurately, and impartially, both receptively and expressively, using any necessary special vocabulary. A person appointed to interpret for deaf and hard of hearing persons shall be a licensed interpreter as defined in section 20-151 or, if a licensed interpreter is unavailable, an interpreter licensed under the laws of another state.

Laws 1999, LB 54, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 12.